Kentucky, session 2025RS, HB585.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the Commonwealth of Kentucky:
Section 1. KRS 6.935 is amended to read as follows:
(1) The Attorney General, or an assistant attorney general designated by him or her,
the Auditor of Public Accounts, cabinet secretaries, and the heads of other state
agencies shall assist the Legislative Oversight and Investigations Committee in
whatever manner the co-chairs deem that these officials can be helpful.
(2) Staffing and support services shall be provided to the Legislative Oversight and
Investigations Committee pursuant to KRS 7.090.
Page 1 of 1
XXXX 2/11/2025 9:45 AM Jacketed